California, session 20252026, AB2057.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 66347) is added to Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 15. Gas Appliances66347. A state agency or local government, including a charter city, shall not adopt or enforce a rule, regulation, resolution, or ordinance, including, but not limited to, an ordinance prohibiting natural gas hookups for new buildings, that directly or indirectly results in prohibiting the use of gas appliances in residential or nonresidential buildings.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 17958.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:17958.5. (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d) and in Section 17922.6, in adopting the ordinances or regulations pursuant to Section 17958, a city or county may make those changes or modifications in the requirements contained in the provisions published in the California Building Standards Code and the other regulations adopted pursuant to Section 17922, including, but not limited to, green building standards, as it determines, pursuant to the provisions of Section 17958.7, are reasonably necessary because of local climatic, geological, or topographical conditions.(b) For purposes of this section, a city or county may make reasonably necessary modifications to the requirements, adopted pursuant to Section 17922, including, but not limited to, green building standards, contained in the provisions of the code and regulations on the basis of local conditions.(c) Commencing October 1, 2025, to June 1, 2031, inclusive, a city or county shall not make a change or modification as described in subdivision (a) or (b), including to green building standards, that is applicable to residential units, unless one of the following conditions is met:(1) The changes or modifications are substantially equivalent to changes or modifications that were previously filed by the governing body of the city or county and were in effect as of September 30, 2025.(2) The commission deems those changes or modifications necessary as emergency standards to protect health and safety.(3) The changes or modifications relate to home hardening.(4) The building standards relate to home hardening and are proposed for adoption by a local fire prevention district pursuant to Section 13869.7.(5) The changes or modifications are necessary to implement a local code amendment that is adopted to align with a general plan approved on or before June 10, 2025, and that permits mixed-fuel residential construction consistent with federal law while also incentivizing all-electric construction as part of an adopted greenhouse gas emissions reduction strategy.(6) The changes or modifications are related to administrative practices, are proposed for adoption during the intervening period pursuant to Section 18942, and exclusively result in any of the following:(A) Reductions in time for a local agency to issue a postentitlement permit.(B) Alterations to a local agency’s postentitlement fee schedule.(C) Modernization of, or adoption of, new permitting platforms and software utilized by the local agency.(D) Reductions in cost of internal operation for a local agency.(E) Establishment, alteration, or removal of local programs related to enforcement of building code violations or complaints alleging building code violations.(d) A city or county shall not make a change or modification as described in subdivision (a) or (b), including to green building standards, that prohibits the use of natural gas in a residential unit.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 17958.7 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:17958.7. (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (e) and in Section 17922.6, the governing body of a city or county, before making any modifications or changes pursuant to Section 17958.5, shall make an express finding that such modifications or changes are reasonably necessary because of local climatic, geological, or topographical conditions. Such a finding shall be available as a public record. A copy of those findings, together with the modification or change expressly marked and identified to which each finding refers, shall be filed with the California Building Standards Commission. No modification or change shall become effective or operative for any purpose until the finding and the modification or change have been filed with the California Building Standards Commission.(b) The California Building Standards Commission may reject a modification or change filed by the governing body of a city or county if no finding was submitted.(c) Commencing October 1, 2025, to June 1, 2031, inclusive, the commission shall reject a modification or change to any building standard affecting a residential unit and filed by the governing body of a city or county, unless one of the following conditions is met:(1) The changes or modifications are substantially equivalent to changes or modifications that were previously filed by the governing body of the city or county and were in effect as of September 30, 2025.(2) The commission deems those changes or modifications necessary as emergency standards to protect health and safety.(3) The changes or modifications relate to home hardening.(4) The building standards relate to home hardening and are proposed for adoption by a local fire prevention district pursuant to Section 13869.7.(5) The changes or modifications are necessary to implement a local code amendment that is adopted to align with a general plan approved on or before June 10, 2025, and that permits mixed-fuel residential construction consistent with federal law while also incentivizing all-electric construction as part of an adopted greenhouse gas emissions reduction strategy.(6) The changes or modifications are related to administrative practices, are proposed for adoption during the intervening period pursuant to Section 18942, and exclusively result in any of the following:(A) Reductions in time for a local agency to issue a postentitlement permit.(B) Alterations to a local agency’s postentitlement fee schedule.(C) Modernization of, or adoption of, new permitting platforms and software utilized by the local agency.(D) Reductions in cost of internal operation for a local agency.(E) Establishment, alteration, or removal of local programs related to enforcement of building code violations or complaints alleging building code violations.(d) (1) The commission, in determining that a modification or change meets any of the criteria in paragraph (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c), may rely on a statement by the local agency to that effect.(2) The changes or modifications made pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) may be filed with the commission and shall be reviewed by the commission, in consultation with the Department of Housing and Community Development, within 60 days of receipt, if requested by the local agency.(e) The commission shall reject a modification or change to any building standard affecting a residential unit and filed by the governing body of a city or county that prohibits the use of natural gas in that residential unit.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 1 and 2 to 3, inclusive, of this act adding Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 66347) to Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code and amending Sections 17958.5 and 17958.7 of the Government Health and Safety Code address a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Sections 1 and 2 1 to 3, inclusive, of this act apply to all cities, including charter cities.